Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.900

Provisions cumulative—Violation of RCW 19.16.250 deemed civil.

The provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative and nonexclusive and shall not affect any other remedy available at law: PROVIDED, That the violation of RCW 19.16.250 shall be construed as exclusively civil and not penal in nature.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 40.]